Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.055

Powers of the court.

(1) Except as otherwise provided for by this chapter, the court in all cases has exclusive authority over the receiver, and the exclusive possession and right of control with respect to all real property and all tangible and intangible personal property with respect to which the receiver is appointed, wherever located, and the exclusive jurisdiction to determine all controversies relating to the collection, preservation, application, and distribution of all the property, and all claims against the receiver arising out of the exercise of the receiver's powers or the performance of the receiver's duties. However, the court does not have exclusive jurisdiction over actions in which a state agency is a party and in which a statute expressly vests jurisdiction or venue elsewhere.

(2) For good cause shown, the court has the power to shorten or expand the time frames specified in this chapter.

[ 2011 c 34 s 2; 2004 c 165 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.